California statutes. Vehicle Code
(a) Only upon request to, and approval by, and in accordance with regulations adopted by, the Director of Food and Agriculture, all of the following are available for inspection by district attorneys and are subject to legal process for admission in any criminal or civil proceeding arising out of a violation of this chapter:

(1) Vehicle weight certificates issued on or after January 1, 1984, pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 12700), Chapter 7.3 (commencing with Section 12740), and Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 12770) of Division 5 of the Business and
 Professions Code.

(2) Other records of vehicle weight relating to those certificates.

(3) Copies of those certificates and records.

(b) All certificates, records, and copies thereof, issued before January 1, 1984, shall not be available for inspection and are not admissible in any criminal or civil proceedings arising out of a violation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1319, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35558.

Any person or business which has an axle weight scale at its loading facilities shall, upon the request of the driver, weigh any load being transported for that person or business before the vehicle leaves the loading facility. In a port facility, this requirement only applies if the scale is located in outbound lanes. The request to weigh shall be based upon a reasonable assumption that the load is overweight.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 217, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35559.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any provision of this article, the power unit of a near-zero emission or zero-emission vehicle may exceed the allowable gross weight limits by up to a maximum of 2,000 pounds.

(2) The maximum allowance may apply to a single power unit or be distributed between more than one power unit, but shall not exceed a total of 2,000 pounds across a single vehicle or combination of vehicles.

(3) The maximum gross vehicle weight shall not exceed 82,000 pounds.

(b) This section shall not be construed to exempt any near-zero-emission or zero-emission vehicle from the weight limits prescribed in Article 2 (commencing with Section 35600), Article 3 (commencing with Section 35650), Article 4 (commencing with Section 35700), or Article 5 (commencing with Section 35750) of
 this chapter.

(c) This section shall not be construed to exempt any near-zero-emission or zero-emission vehicle from tire weight limits imposed by this code or in regulations adopted by the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(d) For purposes of this section, “power unit” means a single unit or a combination of units in a near-zero emission or zero-emission vehicle that provide motive power to a drive system independent of any other power source.

(e) The terms “near-zero-emission vehicle” and “zero-emission vehicle” have the same meanings as defined in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 44258 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) This
 section applies only to the extent expressly authorized by federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 219, Sec. 2.   (AB 1953)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Intermodal Weight Determination Program [35580. - 35581.]

35580.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that a substantial number of container trailers using California highways exceed weight limitations authorized for California highways. Intermodal container trailers are containers which have been unloaded from ships or trains and placed on truck chassis, or are piggyback trailers unloaded from trains, for subsequent transport upon the highways. Container trailers are usually loaded by shippers in other states or foreign countries where gross and axle weight restrictions imposed by this code are of no concern to the loader. These loading practices often result in overweight vehicles traveling on
 California highways, which contributes to highway deterioration. 

(b) The Legislature further finds and declares that the continued growth of intermodal transportation within the United States and the Pacific Rim makes it important for California to initiate a program to allow intermodal freight to be weighed at major terminal locations prior to operation on the highways, to ensure that these vehicles are within the established weight limits. The Legislature finds that the imposition of heavy fines and assessments is one means of reducing the number of overweight vehicles on the highways. A more effective, and preferable, alternative is to assure that intermodal container trailers are properly loaded at the outset by the party responsible for loading goods into the container trailer, so that vehicles meet weight requirements prior to their operation on the highways.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 865, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35581.

(a) The Department of Transportation, in cooperation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, shall develop a plan for implementing or identifying new or existing scale facilities at major intermodal terminals which may serve as intermodal weighing facilities for weighing commercial vehicles which transport intermodal freight, prior to their entry onto any highway which is not specifically exempted from weight limitations by a local authority. The plan shall include consideration of options for financing the construction of
 required intermodal weighing facilities. The plan shall be submitted to the Legislature not later than August 1, 1989.

(b) The Department of Transportation may enter into agreements with local authorities or private entities to provide for exemption from weight restrictions for short distance movement to an intermodal weighing facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 229.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Tire Limits [35600. - 35601.]

35600.

The gross weight upon a solid tire upon a vehicle shall not exceed 600 pounds upon any inch of the channel base width of such tire.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35601.

The gross weight of any vehicle and load resting upon any metal tire in contact with the roadway shall not exceed 500 pounds upon any inch of the width of such tire but this limitation shall not apply to traction engines or tractors, the propulsive power of which is not exerted through wheels resting upon the roadway but by means of a flexible band or chain, known as a movable track, when the portions of the movable tracks in contact with the surface of the roadway present plane surfaces.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Limit Changes on State Highways [35650. - 35655.6.]

35650.

The Department of Transportation, whenever it determines after an engineering investigation that any highway under its jurisdiction will with safety to itself sustain vehicles and loads weighing more than the maximum weight limits set forth in this code, shall have authority to declare and to fix a weight limit for the highway greater than the maximum weight limit set forth in this code. Thereafter it shall be lawful to operate or move vehicles and loads of a gross weight upon the highways designated, equal to but not in excess of the maximum weight limit fixed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

35651.

Whenever in the judgment of the Department of Transportation any state highway will not with safety to itself sustain the maximum weights permitted under this code for the highway, the department shall determine, after a public hearing, the maximum weight which the highway will sustain.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

35652.

The Department of Transportation shall give notice of the time and place of the hearing by posting a notice in the county seat of each county in which any affected portion of the highway is located and shall also post copies of the notice at intervals of not more than one mile along said highway and a notice at each end of the affected portion thereof. Notice of the hearing shall be given for not less than 10 days and the hearing shall be had at the county seat of the county in which the affected highway is situated or at some other place convenient to the portion of the highway affected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

35653.

The hearing shall be conducted by one or more engineers appointed by the Director of Transportation. The engineers shall hear all evidence presented at the time and place mentioned in the notice and shall report findings made in writing to the Director of Transportation. Upon the basis of the findings, the Director of Transportation shall declare in writing the maximum weight which can be maintained with safety upon the state highway. In no event shall the weight be less than 16,000 pounds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

35654.

Following the declaration of maximum weight as provided in this article, the Department of Transportation shall erect suitable signs at each end of the affected portion of the highway and at such other points as the department deems necessary to give adequate notice of the weight limits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

35655.

(a) No person shall drive a vehicle on any state highway when the weight of the vehicle and load is greater than the maximum weight which the highway will sustain. Violations of this subdivision shall be punished in accordance with the schedule of fines set forth in Section 42030.

(b) Upon the trial of any person charged with a violation with respect to signs erected under Section 35654, proof of the determination and the maximum weight by the Department of Transportation and the existence of the signs constitutes prima facie evidence of the maximum weight which the
 state highway will sustain.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 542, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

35655.5.

(a) Notwithstanding this article or any other provision of law, no vehicle, as described in Sections 410 and 655, with a gross weight of 9,000 pounds or more, shall be operated on the segment of Interstate Route 580 (I-580) that is located between Grand Avenue in the City of Oakland and the city limits of the City of San Leandro. This subdivision does not apply to passenger buses or paratransit vehicles.

(b) The Department of Transportation shall erect suitable signs at each
 end of the portion of highway described in subdivision (a) and at any other points that the department deems necessary to give adequate notice of the weight limit imposed under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 212, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

35655.6.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), a person shall not drive a commercial vehicle with three or more axles, or a gross vehicle weight or a combined gross weight of 9,000 pounds or more, on the segment of State Route 2 (SR-2) that is located between Interstate Route 210 (I-210) in the City of La Canada Flintridge and County Route N4 (Big Pine Highway) in the County of Los Angeles.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to any of the following vehicles:

(1) An authorized emergency vehicle.

(2) A vehicle operated by a publicly or privately owned public utility.

(3) A vehicle operated by a government agency.

(4) A transit bus servicing facilities accessible only from that portion of State Route 2 specified in subdivision (a).

(5) A tow truck providing assistance to a vehicle that is accessible only from that portion of State Route 2 specified in subdivision (a).

(6) A commercial vehicle making deliveries to or from, or servicing, property that is either of the following:

(A) Located within the city limits of the
 City of La Canada Flintridge.

(B) Is accessible only from the portion of State Route 2 specified in subdivision (a).

(7) A commercial vehicle involved in a motion picture, commercial, or television production conducting motion picture, commercial, or television production activities in areas that are accessible only from that portion of State Route 2 specified in subdivision (a).

(c) A person who violates this section shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42030 or one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is greater.

(d) The Department of Transportation shall erect suitable signs at each end of the portion of State Route 2 specified in subdivision (a) and any other points that the department deems necessary
 to give adequate notice of the prohibition pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 147, Sec. 1.   Effective August 6, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Local Authorities [35700. - 35722.]

35700.

(a) The legislative body of any county or city may by ordinance permit the operation and moving of vehicles and loads upon highways under their respective jurisdictions of a maximum gross weight in excess of the maximum gross weight of vehicles and loads specified in this code.

(b) This section does not apply to state highways.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35700.5.

(a) The Department of Transportation, upon adoption of an ordinance or resolution that is in conformance with the provisions of this section by the City of Carson, the City of Long Beach, and the City of Los Angeles, covering designated routes, may issue a special permit to the operator of a vehicle, combination of vehicles, or mobile equipment, permitting the operation and movement of the vehicle, combination, or equipment, and its load, on the 3.66-mile portion of State Route 47 and State Route 103 known as the Terminal Island Freeway, between Willow Street in the City of Long Beach and Terminal Island in the City of Long Beach and the City of Los Angeles, and on the 2.4-mile portion of State Highway Route 1, that is between Sanford Avenue in
 the City of Los Angeles and Harbor Avenue in the City of Long Beach, if the vehicle, combination, or equipment meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The vehicle, combination of vehicles, or mobile equipment is used to transport intermodal cargo containers that are moving in international commerce.

(2) The vehicle, combination of vehicles, or mobile equipment, in combination with its load, has a maximum gross weight in excess of the maximum gross weight limit of vehicles and loads specified in this chapter, but does not exceed 95,000 pounds gross vehicle weight.

(3) (A) The vehicle, combination of vehicles, or mobile equipment conforms to the axle weight limits specified in Section 35550.

(B) The vehicle, combination of vehicles,
 or mobile equipment conforms to the axle weight limits in Section 35551, except as specified in subparagraph (C).

(C) Vehicles, combinations of vehicles, or mobile equipment that impose more than 80,000 pounds total gross weight on the highway by any group of two or more consecutive axles, exceed 60 feet in length between the extremes of any group of two or more consecutive axles, or have more than six axles shall conform to weight limits that shall be determined by the Department of Transportation.

(b) The permit issued by the Department of Transportation shall be required to authorize the operation or movement of a vehicle, combination of vehicles, or mobile equipment described in subdivision (a). The permit shall not authorize the movement of hazardous materials or hazardous wastes, as those terms are defined by local, state, and federal law. The following criteria shall be
 included in the application for the permit:

(1) A description of the loads and vehicles to be operated under the permit.

(2) An agreement wherein each applicant agrees to be responsible for all injuries to persons and for all damage to real or personal property of the state and others directly caused by or resulting from the operation of the applicant’s vehicles or combination of vehicles under the conditions of the permit. The applicant shall agree to hold harmless and indemnify the state and all its agents for all costs or claims arising out of or caused by the movement of vehicles or combination of vehicles under the conditions of the permit.

(3) The applicant shall provide proof of financial responsibility that covers the movement of the shipment as described in subdivision (a). The insurance shall meet the
 minimum requirements established by law.

(4) An agreement to carry a copy of the permit in the vehicle at all times and furnish the copy upon request of an employee of the Department of the California Highway Patrol or the Department of Transportation.

(5) An agreement to place an indicia, developed by the Department of Transportation, in consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, upon the vehicle identifying it as a vehicle possibly operating under this section. The indicia shall be displayed in the lower right area of the front windshield of the power unit. The Department of Transportation may charge a fee to cover the cost of producing and issuing this indicia.

(c) The permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be valid for one year. The permit may be canceled by the Department of
 Transportation for any of the following reasons:

(1) The failure of the applicant to maintain any of the conditions required pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The failure of the applicant to maintain a satisfactory rating, as required by Section 34501.12.

(3) A determination by the Department of Transportation that there is sufficient cause to cancel the permit because the continued movement of the applicant’s vehicles under the permit would jeopardize the safety of the motorists on the roadway or result in undue damage to the highways listed in this section.

(d) This section does not authorize an applicant or holder of a special permit under subdivision (a) to operate a vehicle or combination of vehicles in excess of the maximum gross weight limit of
 vehicles and loads specified in this chapter outside of the designated corridors identified in subdivision (a). A violation of this subdivision shall result in the revocation of the permit.

(e) The Department of Transportation may charge a fee to cover the cost of issuing a permit pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 298, Sec. 2.   (AB 1128)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

35700.6.

(a) The Department of Transportation, upon adoption of an ordinance or resolution that is in conformance with the provisions of this section by the City of Oakland, covering the designated route, may issue a special permit to the operator of a vehicle, combination of vehicles, or mobile equipment, permitting the operation and movement of the vehicle, combination, or equipment, and its load, on the 1.7-mile portion of State Route 185 that is between High Street and Hegenberger Road known as International Boulevard in the City of Oakland, if the vehicle, combination, or equipment meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The vehicle, combination of vehicles, or mobile equipment is used to transport intermodal cargo containers that are moving
 in international commerce.

(2) The vehicle, combination of vehicles, or mobile equipment, in combination with its load, has a maximum gross weight in excess of the maximum gross weight limit of vehicles and loads specified in this chapter, but does not exceed 95,000 pounds gross vehicle weight.

(3) (A) The vehicle, combination of vehicles, or mobile equipment conforms to the axle weight limits specified in Section 35550.

(B) The vehicle, combination of vehicles, or mobile equipment conforms to the axle weight limits in Section 35551, except as specified in subparagraph (C).

(C) Vehicles, combinations of vehicles, or mobile equipment that impose more than 80,000 pounds total gross weight on the highway by any group of two or more
 consecutive axles, exceed 60 feet in length between the extremes of any group of two or more consecutive axles, or have more than six axles shall conform to weight limits that shall be determined by the Department of Transportation.

(4) The vehicle, combination of vehicles, or mobile equipment only operate during the hours determined to be appropriate by the Department of Transportation, in concurrence with the City of Oakland.

(b) The permit issued by the Department of Transportation shall be required to authorize the operation or movement of a vehicle, combination of vehicles, or mobile equipment described in subdivision (a). The permit shall not authorize the movement of hazardous materials or hazardous wastes, as those terms are defined by local, state, and federal law. The following criteria shall be included in the application for the permit:

(1) A description of the loads and vehicles to be operated under the permit.

(2) An agreement wherein each applicant agrees to be responsible for all injuries to persons and for all damage to real or personal property of the state and others directly caused by or resulting from the operation of the applicant’s vehicles or combination of vehicles under the conditions of the permit. The applicant shall agree to hold harmless and indemnify the state and all its agents for all costs or claims arising out of or caused by the movement of vehicles or combination of vehicles under the conditions of the permit.

(3) The applicant shall provide proof of financial responsibility that covers the movement of the shipment as described in subdivision (a). The insurance shall meet the minimum requirements established by law.

(4) An agreement to carry a copy of the permit in the vehicle at all times and furnish the copy upon request of an employee of the Department of the California Highway Patrol or the Department of Transportation.

(5) An agreement to place an indicia, developed by the Department of Transportation, in consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, upon the vehicle identifying it as a vehicle possibly operating under this section. The indicia shall be displayed in the lower right area of the front windshield of the power unit. The Department of Transportation may charge a fee to cover the cost of producing and issuing this indicia.

(c) The permit issued pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be valid for one year. The permit may be canceled by the Department of Transportation for any of the following
 reasons:

(1) The failure of the applicant to maintain any of the conditions required pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The failure of the applicant to maintain a satisfactory rating, as required by Section 34501.12.

(3) A determination by the Department of Transportation that there is sufficient cause to cancel the permit because the continued movement of the applicant’s vehicles under the permit would jeopardize the safety of the motorists on the roadway or result in undue damage to the highways listed in this section.

(d) This section does not authorize an applicant or holder of a special permit under subdivision (a) to operate a vehicle or combination of vehicles in excess of the maximum gross weight limit of vehicles and loads specified in this
 chapter outside of the designated corridors identified in subdivision (a). A violation of this subdivision shall result in the revocation of the permit.

(e) The Department of Transportation may charge a fee to cover the cost of issuing a permit pursuant to subdivision (a).

(f) On or before January 1, 2031, the City of Oakland shall submit to the Legislature and the Department of Transportation, in conformance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, a report on all of the following:

(1) The cost of road repairs caused by the vehicle, combination of vehicles, or mobile equipment on International Boulevard.

(2) Community impacts, including safety impacts, of the vehicle, combination of vehicles, or mobile equipment on International Boulevard.

(3) Status of evaluating and implementing an alternate truck route providing freight movement direct access to San Leandro Street instead of International Boulevard.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until an alternate truck route to San Leandro Street becomes available pursuant to a notice by the Department of Transportation, or until December 31, 2031, whichever occurs first, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 109, Sec. 8.   (SB 153)   Effective September 17, 2025.   Conditionally repealed on or before December 31, 2031, as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

35701.

(a) Any city, or county for a residence district, may, by ordinance, prohibit the use of a street by any commercial vehicle or by any vehicle exceeding a maximum gross weight limit, except with respect to any vehicle which is subject to Sections 1031 to 1036, inclusive, of the Public Utilities Code, and except with respect to vehicles used for the collection and transportation of garbage, rubbish, or refuse using traditionally used routes in San Diego County when the solid waste management plan prepared under Section 66780.1 of the Government Code is amended to designate each traditionally used route used for the purpose of
 transporting garbage, rubbish, or refuse which intersects with a local or regional arterial circulation route contained within a city or county’s traffic circulation element and which provides access to a solid waste disposal site.

(b) The ordinance shall not be effective until appropriate signs are erected indicating either the streets affected by the ordinance or the streets not affected, as the local authority determines will best serve to give notice of the ordinance.

(c) No ordinance adopted pursuant to this section after November 10, 1969, shall apply to any state highway which is included in the National System of Interstate and Defense Highways, except an ordinance which has been approved by a two-thirds vote of the California Transportation Commission.

(d) The solid waste management plan prepared under
 Section 66780.1 of the Government Code by San Diego County may designate the traditionally used routes.

(e) “Traditionally used route,” for purposes of this section, means any street used for a period of one year or more as access to or from a solid waste disposal site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 616, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35702.

No ordinance proposed under Section 35701 is effective with respect to any highway which is not under the exclusive jurisdiction of the local authority enacting the ordinance, or, in the case of any state highway, until the ordinance has been submitted by the governing body of the local authority to, and approved in writing by, the Department of Transportation. In submitting a proposed ordinance to the department for approval, the governing body of the local authority shall designate therein, an alternate route for the use of vehicles, which route shall remain
 unrestricted by any local regulation as to weight limits or types of vehicles so long as the ordinance proposed shall remain in effect. The approval of the proposed ordinance by the Department of Transportation shall constitute an approval by it of the alternate route so designated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 71.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

35703.

No ordinance adopted pursuant to Section 35701 shall prohibit any commercial vehicles coming from an unrestricted street having ingress and egress by direct route to and from a restricted street when necessary for the purpose of making pickups or deliveries of goods, wares, and merchandise from or to any building or structure located on the restricted street or for the purpose of delivering materials to be used in the actual and bona fide repair, alteration, remodeling, or construction of any building or structure upon the restricted street for which a building permit has previously been obtained.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35704.

No ordinance adopted pursuant to Section 35701 to decrease weight limits shall apply to any vehicle owned by a public utility or a licensed contractor while necessarily in use in the construction, installation, or repair of any public utility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 371, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35705.

Section 35701 shall not be applicable to any city street on which money from the State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund has been or is used for construction or maintenance except in such cases as the legislative body of the city, after notice and hearing, determines to reduce weight limits on such streets. Notice of the hearing shall be published as provided in Section 6064 of the Government Code. The notice shall advise all interested parties that they may submit written and oral objections to the proposed action and shall designate a time and place for presentation of such objections. The time for submission of objections shall not expire, and the
 hearing may not be held, less than 60 days after the first publication of notice. The hearing shall be held before the legislative body of the city. All objections shall be considered and interested parties shall be afforded an adequate opportunity to be heard in respect to their objections.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

35706.

Boards of supervisors in their respective counties may by ordinance reduce the permissible weight of vehicles and loads upon unimproved county highways or upon county bridges.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35707.

Boards of supervisors in their respective counties may by ordinance reduce the permissible weights upon improved highways only which by reason of deterioration will be destroyed unless the weight limits are reduced, but no such reduction shall extend for a period of more than 90 days unless actual repair of the highway is begun within that time and thereafter continuously carried on to completion.

For the purposes of this section, an improved county highway means a highway paved with cement concrete or asphaltic concrete, or a highway with a roadway of hard surface not less than four inches thick made up of a mixture of rock,
 sand, or gravel bound together by an artificial binder other than natural soil.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35708.

In the event any person protests in writing to the clerk of the board of supervisors within 15 days after the adoption of an ordinance reducing the permissible gross weight upon an improved highway, the reduction in weight shall not become final until the Department of Transportation after a hearing approves the action of the board of supervisors in making such reduction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

35709.

The hearing shall be held in the county in which the highway is located within 25 days after a request therefor, and shall be conducted by one or more engineers of the Department of Transportation to be designated by the Director of Transportation. The engineers shall hear all evidence presented and report their findings in writing to the director. Such director shall, upon the basis of the findings, declare in writing the approval or disapproval of the reduction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 545.)
-------------------------------------------

35710.

Whenever any weight limit different from those specified in this code is fixed in accordance with Section 35706 or 35707, the board of supervisors shall cause signs indicating the weight so fixed to be erected at all entrances to the highway upon which the permissible gross weight is altered.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

35711.

No ordinance adopted pursuant to Section 35706 or 35707 or 35712 shall prohibit any commercial vehicle from using any county highway by direct route to or from a state highway for the purpose of delivering or loading for transportation goods, wares, or merchandise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

35712.

(a) Any county may, by ordinance, prohibit the use of any highway located in an unincorporated residential or subdivision area by any commercial vehicle exceeding a gross weight of 14,000 pounds.

(b) Any county of the third class, as defined by Section 28024 of the Government Code, or of the ninth class, as defined by Section 28030 of the Government Code, may, by ordinance, prohibit the use of any highway located in an unincorporated residential or subdivision area by any
 commercial vehicle exceeding a gross weight of 5,000 pounds.

(c) This section does not apply to a vehicle operated by, or on behalf of, a public utility in connection with the installation, operation, maintenance, or repair of its facilities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 72.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

35713.

No ordinance closing a highway under Section 35712 or 35715 is effective until appropriate signs are erected indicating either the highways affected by the ordinance or the highways not affected as the county may determine will best serve to give notice of the ordinance, nor shall any ordinance be effective with respect to any county highway unless the board of supervisors designates in the ordinance an alternate route for the use of the vehicles which shall remain unrestricted by any local regulation as to commercial vehicles so long as the ordinance proposed shall remain in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 660.)
-------------------------------------------

35714.

No ordinance adopted pursuant to Section 35712 shall be effective with respect to:

(a) Any vehicle which is subject to the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1031) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) Any highway, any portion of which is also under the jurisdiction of a city, unless the consent of the governing body of the city is first obtained.

(c) Any commercial vehicle coming from an unrestricted highway having ingress and egress by direct route to and from the restricted highway when necessary for the purpose of making pickups or deliveries of goods, wares, and merchandise from or to any building or structure located on the restricted highway or for the purpose of delivering materials to be used in the actual and bona fide repair, alteration, remodeling, or construction of any building or structure upon the restricted highway for which a building permit has previously been obtained.

(d) The operation of ambulances or hearses.

(e) Any vehicle owned, operated, controlled, or used by a public utility in connection with the construction, installation, operation, maintenance, or repair of any public utility facilities.

(f) Any state highway, until the proposed ordinance has been submitted by the board of supervisors of the county to and approved in writing by the Department of Transportation. In submitting a proposed ordinance to the department for approval, the board of supervisors shall designate therein, an alternate route for the use of the vehicles which shall remain unrestricted by any local regulation as to commercial vehicles so long as the ordinance proposed shall remain in effect. The approval of the proposed ordinance by the Department of Transportation shall constitute an approval by the department of the alternate route so designated.

(g) Vehicles operated as an incident to any industrial, commercial or agricultural enterprise conducted within the boundaries of the unincorporated residential subdivision area.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 877, Sec. 73.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

35715.

(a) The County of Nevada may by ordinance prohibit the use of Northwoods Boulevard in such county by any commercial vehicle exceeding a gross weight specified in the ordinance.

(b) No ordinance adopted pursuant to this section shall be effective with respect to:

(1) Any commercial vehicle coming from an unrestricted highway having ingress and egress by direct route to and from the restricted highway when necessary for the purpose of making pickups or deliveries of goods, wares, and merchandise from or to any building or
 structure located on the restricted highway or for the purpose of delivering materials to be used in the actual and bona fide repair, alteration, remodeling, or construction of any building or structure upon the restricted highway for which a building permit has previously been obtained.

(2) The operation of ambulances or hearses.

(3) Any vehicle owned, operated, controlled, or used by a public utility in connection with the construction, installation, operation, maintenance, or repair of any public utility facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 660.)
-------------------------------------------

35715.1.

(a) The County of Tuolumne may by ordinance prohibit the use of Old Priest Grade in that county by a vehicle or combination of vehicles that exceeds a weight limit of 7,500 pounds or more. The weight limit shall be determined by the County Board of Supervisors and specified in the ordinance.

(b) An ordinance adopted pursuant to this section is not effective with respect to the following:

(1) A vehicle or
 combination of vehicles coming from an unrestricted highway having ingress and egress by direct route to and from the restricted highway when necessary for the purpose of making pickups or deliveries of goods, wares, and merchandise from or to any building or structure located on the restricted highway or for the purpose of delivering materials to be used in the actual and bona fide repair, alteration, remodeling, or construction of a building or structure upon the restricted highway for which a building permit has previously been obtained.

(2) The operation of ambulances, hearses, or vehicles providing emergency roadside services or roadside assistance.

(3) A vehicle or combination of vehicles owned, operated, controlled, or used by a public utility in connection with the construction, installation, operation, maintenance, or repair of a public utility
 facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 15, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

35716.

No ordinance adopted by a city to decrease weight limits shall apply to any vehicle owned, leased, operated or controlled by any licensed contractor while necessarily in use in the construction, maintenance, or repair of a public works project, or by any highway carrier regulated by the Public Utilities Commission while transporting any materials to or from a public works project, when the bids were opened prior to the adoption of the ordinance unless an alternate direct route is provided substantially within and by the city enacting the ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 393.)
-------------------------------------------

35717.
